Hawaii statutes.
§184-5 Rules and enforcement; penalty.
(a) The department may, subject to chapter 91, make, amend, and repeal rules
having the force and effect of law, governing the use and protection of the
state park system, including state monuments as established under section
6E-31, and including any private property over which there has been granted to
the State any right of free public access or use for recreational, park,
viewing of any historical, archaeological, natural, or scientific feature,
object, or site, or related purpose, or property thereon, and also governing
the use and protection of any recreational, scenic, historical, archaeological,
natural, scientific, and related resources of state and private lands, and
enforce those rules. Any person who violates any of the rules so prescribed
shall be held liable for restoration of or restitution for any damages to
public or private property and shall also be subject to the confiscation of any
tools and equipment used in the violation and of any plants, objects, or
artifacts removed illegally from such properties. Except as otherwise provided
by the department, the more restrictive rules of the department shall apply in
any unit of the state park system or any public use area which is also governed
by the rules of any forest reserve, public hunting ground, or other department
district or area.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), any
person violating this chapter, any rule adopted pursuant thereto, or the terms
and conditions of any permit issued thereunder, in addition to any other
penalties, shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and shall be fined not less
than:

(1) $100 for a first offense;

(2) $200 for a second offense; and

(3) $500 for a third or subsequent offense.

(c) Any person violating this chapter, any
rule adopted pursuant thereto, or the terms and conditions of any permit issued
thereunder, regulating vehicular parking or traffic movement shall have
committed a traffic infraction as set forth in chapter 291D, the adjudication
of which shall be subject to the provisions contained therein. A person found
to have committed such a traffic infraction shall be fined not more than:

(1) $100 for a first violation;

(2) $200 for a second violation; and

(3) $500 for a third or subsequent violation.

(d) The fines specified in this section shall
not be suspended or waived. Each day of each violation shall constitute a
separate offense.

(e) Any civil penalty for any violation of
this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder shall not be deemed to preclude the
State from pursuing any criminal action against that person.

(f) The department may confer on the director
of state parks and upon other employees of the division the powers of police
officers, including the power to serve and execute warrants and arrest, or
issue summons or citations to, offenders in all matters relating to the
enforcement, in any state park, parkway, or state monument, or in any private
property over which there has been granted to the State any right of free
public access or use for recreational, park, viewing of any historical,
archaeological, natural, or scientific feature, object, or site, or related
purpose of:

(1) The laws applicable to the state parks and
parkways and to historical objects and sites and the rules adopted under the
provisions of this section; and

(2) Traffic laws and ordinances.

Those police powers shall also extend to the
enforcement of laws of the State and the rules of the department relative to
the protection and proper use of the recreational, scenic, historical, natural,
and archaeological, scientific, and related resources of state and private
lands. The conferring of powers shall include the designation of those
employees as state parks enforcement officers. [L 1949, c 185, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§19-36; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; am L 1965, c 96, §16;
HRS §184-5; am L 1974, c 245, §1; am L 1975, c 24, §5; am L 1979, c 105, §13;
am L 2002, c 24, §2; am L 2008, c 101, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next